Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Adjudication
§ 41-4-311.
Others contesting rights of original claimants; when permitted; procedures generally.

Whenever the rights to the use of the waters of any stream and all its tributaries within the state have been adjudicated as provided by law, and it shall appear by the records of such adjudication that it had not been had at one (1) and the same proceeding, then in such case the state board of control shall be and is hereby authorized to give notice of the opening to public inspection of all proofs or evidences of appropriation of water, and the findings of the board in relation thereto from the stream and its tributaries in the manner and according to the provisions of W.S.

41-4-309

; and any persons, corporations or associations who may desire to contest the claims or rights of other persons, corporations or associations, as set up in the proofs or established by the board, shall proceed in the manner provided for in W.S.

41-4-312

,

41-4-313

and

41-4-314

; provided, that contests may not be entered into and shall not be maintained except between appropriators who were not parties to the same adjudication proceedings in the original hearings.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 92, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 795; C.S. 1920, § 916; R.S. 1931, § 122-137; C.S. 1945, § 71-260; W.S. 1957, § 41-175.

Cross references. —

For duty of superintendent to transmit evidence and testimony to board of control, and as to issuance and cost of new certificate, see §

41-4-315

.

Power of legislature. —

The legislature has no power to make adjudications by the board of control binding upon persons who were not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Purpose of act. —

Section

41-4-310

was enacted as state policy to establish certainty as the foundational basis of justice in administration of water rights, and requiring all to thereunder submit proofs within 1 year; and statute clearly holds that plaintiffs have a water right, as to priority and amount, as awarded by board of control, and no other or greater, there is no implication to the contrary in this section. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Provisions discretionary. —

The provisions of this section as to giving notice of the opening of records for contest are discretionary and not mandatory. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Adjudication. —

The word “adjudication” as used herein means the determination of priorities by the board of control. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

“Adjudication” of stream priorities is a proceeding in rem, or quasi in rem; and adjudication is generally considered the equivalent of “determination.” Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Jurisdiction of board. —

In action to quiet title to water right, notice of adjudication of Big Laramie river having been appropriately given, evidence of which was offered by plaintiff, was sufficient to show that board of control had jurisdiction to adjudicate rights in that stream, thus giving defendants and all similarly situated prima facie right to water therefrom adjudicated to them, and hence also showing their interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Division between streams. —

Where board of control adjudicated priorities on a stream and the tributary in separate proceedings, though appropriators on one stream were not parties to the action respecting the other, adjudications were sufficient to give power to the water commissioner to divide the water between the streams, though the proceedings were not binding on those not parties. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Presumption that notice given. —

If any tribunal has unlimited jurisdiction over a class of cases, it stands on same footing as courts of general jurisdiction respecting presumptions of regularity, including presumption that due notice was given. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Where recital appears in water adjudication decree, by state board of control, that due notice had been given to interested parties, presumption will be indulged in favor of such inferior tribunal as obtains with respect of courts of general jurisdiction to show jurisdiction of parties. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Original appropriators, predecessors of plaintiffs, having been afforded full opportunity to present their claims for adjudication of water rights, were not deprived of any constitutional right, and plaintiffs are in no better position. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Presumption that appearance made. —

Where adjudication, by state board of control, of water rights on Little Laramie river, though failing to recite that notice was given interested parties, was held nearly 50 years ago, and courts indulge presumptions the more readily when proceedings are ancient, when the attack is collateral, and when it is admitted that decreed adjudicated rights in favor of plaintiffs' predecessors in interest, it must be presumed it was after appearance. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action to quiet title to water right prescriptively claimed by plaintiffs in Little Laramie river, allegation in defendant's answer that board of control had adjudicated a water right to predecessor of plaintiff, which was admitted, carried with it presumption of appearance and also of regularity, and all objections to pleadings must be overruled. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Correct adjudication presumed. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, independently of scope of this section, plaintiffs pleaded prescriptive right thereto in the Little Laramie watershed, to which defendants answered, in part, setting up decrees of predecessor of plaintiffs, and, not being denied presumption of correctness of these decrees arose, making further pleading or proof of correctness unnecessary. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

The adjudications of the board are prima facie evidence of the correctness thereof on persons not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

Jurisdiction of courts, in matters of water adjudication, is, aside from appeals, confined to determine rights in individual cases, to the extent that the board of control has not acted. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Requirements for prescriptive title. —

Testimony and findings of the court examined failed to show prescriptive right in plaintiffs adverse to defendants, for possession to ripen into prescriptive title must be actual, hostile, exclusive, and continuous for period prescribed by statute. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

No prescriptive rights to water. —

Since 1890 when water rights were required to be initiated by permit from state engineer, it is settled that prescriptive right to state waters cannot obtain. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

A water right by prescription being impossible up to adjudication in Little Laramie river in 1892, and it being impossible for appropriators to change their claim to priority as to time and amount in their particular tributary stream, they will not be better enabled to take a different course because their dispute is with appropriators direct from the main stream. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Standing to attack another's right. —

Before party may attack right of another, either on constitutional or other grounds, he must show an interest which is invaded. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Effect of pleadings. —

In an action to quiet title to water rights, claimed by prescription in the Little Laramie river, answer setting up defense of decrees by board of control in Big Laramie river, admission by plaintiffs that the board of control had initiated a proceeding and decreed rights in latter river and its tributaries, while denying all other allegations, effect is that decree itself only is questioned. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Enlargement of rights. —

Section

41-4-310

estops water users under decrees of state board of control from claiming any other or greater rights than thereunder, hence in a suit to obtain enlarged rights not only the testimony offered but that admitted, in support of the petition, was immaterial and had no tendency to establish any rights in the plaintiff. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Relevancy. —

In action by plaintiffs to quiet title, claimed by prescription, to water right in Little Laramie river watershed, and to which defendants set up decrees in that and Big Laramie rivers, adjudication in connection with Little Laramie was relevant to show plaintiffs' claim unfounded, and determination in Big Laramie was relevant to show defendants' interest in the controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Admissibility of copy of adjudication. —

A copy of the record of the decree of adjudication, certified by the clerk of the board of control as true and correct copy of original decree, is admissible. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Photostatic copies of pen and ink records of decrees in the board of control, showing nothing more suspicious than interlineations, interlineations will not prevent their admission as evidence, when properly certified, especially as they are what is called ancient documents. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Fact that a certified copy of a judicial proceeding omits signature of judge to the record will not render the copy inadmissible, especially if signature of judge was not necessary to validity of original record, and no statute exists requiring record of board of control to be signed by any officer. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Laches. —

Where suits to quiet title to water rights in Little Laramie river were started in 1932 attacking appropriation claimed by defendants under an adjudication by board of control in 1903, attack upon at least largest part of defendant's appropriation was barred by laches. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 41-4-312.
Others contesting rights of original claimants; notice to superintendent; time limits; affidavit; notice of hearing generally.

Should any person, corporation or association of persons owning any irrigation works, or claiming any interest in the stream or streams involved in the adjudication, desire to contest any of the rights of the persons, corporations or associations who have submitted their evidence to the superintendent as aforesaid; such persons, corporations or associations shall, within fifteen (15) days after the testimony so taken shall have been opened to public inspection, in writing, notify the superintendent of the water division in which is located said irrigation works or stream or streams, stating with reasonable certainty the grounds of their proposed contest, which statement shall be verified by the affidavit of the contestant, his agent or attorney, and the said division superintendent shall notify the said contestant and the person, corporation or association whose rights are contested, to appear before him at such convenient place as the superintendent shall designate in said notice.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 23; 1895, ch. 62, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 867; C.S. 1910, § 772; C.S. 1920, § 893; R.S. 1931, § 122-112; C.S. 1945, § 71-211; W.S. 1957, § 41-176.

Cross references. —

As to final proof of appropriation, and as to procedures generally, see §

41-4-511

.

Prior adjudication. —

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).

§ 41-4-313.
Others contesting rights of original claimants; when hearing to be held; notice; powers of superintendents; proceedings generally.

Said superintendent shall also fix the time, both as to the day and hour, for the hearing of said contest, which date shall not be less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) days from the date the notice is served on the party, association or corporation, which notice and the return thereof shall be made in the same manner as summons are served in civil actions in the district courts of this state. Superintendents of water divisions shall have power to adjourn hearings from time to time upon reasonable notice to all the parties interested, and to issue subpoenas and compel the attendance of witnesses to testify upon such hearings, which shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas issued out of the district courts of the state; and shall have the power to compel such witnesses so subpoenaed to testify and give evidence in said matter; said witnesses shall receive fees as in civil cases, to be paid by the party or parties against whom the contest shall be finally determined. The evidence on such proceedings shall be confined to the subjects enumerated in the notice of contest.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 23; 1895, ch. 62, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 868; C.S. 1910, § 773; C.S. 1920, § 894; R.S. 1931, § 122-113; C.S. 1945, § 71-212; W.S. 1957, § 41-177.

Cross references. —

As to witness fees and mileage, see §

41-3-328

.

As to final proof of appropriation and as to procedures generally, see §

41-4-511

.

As to process and notice generally, see §§

1-6-101

through

1-6-301

.

As to witness fees and mileage generally, see §

1-14-102

.

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).

§ 41-4-314.
Others contesting rights of original claimants; daily deposit required during hearings; cost of preparation of transcript; disposition of moneys deposited upon close of hearing.

The superintendent shall require a deposit of eight dollars ($8.00) from each of the contestants and contestees for each day he shall be so engaged in taking evidence on said contest. The contestant shall pay the cost of preparation of the transcript of said evidence before the contest is transmitted by the superintendent to the board of control for final determination or adjudication. Upon the final determination or the adjudication of the matters by the board of control, an order shall be entered directing that the money so deposited shall be refunded to the persons, associations or corporations in whose favor such contest shall be determined, and that all moneys deposited by other parties therein shall be turned over by the superintendent to the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 23; 1895, ch. 62, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 869; C.S. 1910, § 774; C.S. 1920, § 895; R.S. 1931, § 122-114; C.S. 1945, § 71-213; W.S. 1957, § 41-178; Laws 1959, ch. 175, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to final proof of appropriation and as to procedure generally, see §

41-4-511

.

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).

§ 41-4-315.
Others contesting rights of original claimants; duty of superintendent to transmit evidence and testimony to board of control; issuance and costs of new certificate.

Upon the completion of the testimony and evidence taken in contests initiated under the provisions of this act [§§

41-4-311

,

41-4-315

], it shall be the duty of the superintendent to transmit all evidence and testimony in said contests to the office of the board of control in person or by registered mail, and the action of said board in relation thereto shall be governed by the provisions of law applicable to contest cases in original adjudication proceedings; provided, that, if as a result of any such contest it shall be necessary to cancel any final certificate theretofore issued by said board and issue a new certificate in accordance with the findings of the board, such certificate shall be issued without cost to the person entitled to it, other than is incident to a proper recording of such certificate in the office of the county clerk.

Upon the completion of the evidence in the original hearing before the superintendent, and the evidence taken in all contests, it shall be his duty to transmit all the evidence and testimony in said adjudication to the office of the board of control in person, or by registered mail.

History.

A) Laws 1903, ch. 92, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 796; C.S. 1920, § 917; R.S. 1931, § 122-138; C.S. 1945, § 71-261: (b) Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 23; 1895, ch. 62, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 870; C.S. 1910, § 775; C.S. 1920, § 896; R.S. 1931, § 122-115; C.S. 1945, § 71-214; W.S. 1957, § 41-179.

Cross references. —

See also §§

41-4-310

and

41-4-311

in connection with this section.

Editor's notes. —

Because of the similarity in the provisions of §§ 71-214 and 71-261, W.C.S. 1945, they have been combined to form a single section consisting of 2 paragraphs, each carrying its own historical citation.

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).

§ 41-4-316.
Examination and measurement of capacity of streams and works diverting water; maps or plats.

It shall be the duty of the state engineer or some qualified assistant, to proceed at the time specified in the notice to the parties on said stream, to be adjudicated, to make an examination of said stream, and the works diverting water therefrom, said examination to include the measurement of the discharge of said stream, and of the carrying capacity of the various ditches and canals diverting water therefrom; an examination of the irrigated lands and an approximate measurement of the lands irrigated, or susceptible of irrigation from the various ditches and canals, which said observation and measurements shall be reduced to writing, and made a matter of record in his office; and it shall be the duty of the state engineer to make, or cause to be made, a map or plat on a scale of not less than one (1) inch to the mile, showing, with substantial accuracy, the course of said stream, the location of each ditch or canal diverting water therefrom, and the legal subdivisions of lands which have been irrigated, or which are susceptible of irrigation from the ditches and canals already constructed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 24; R.S. 1899, § 871; C.S. 1910, § 776; C.S. 1920, § 897; R.S. 1931, § 122-116; C.S. 1945, § 71-215; W.S. 1957, § 41-180.

Conclusiveness of adjudication. —

The adjudication by board of control under §

41-4-317

, considering the return of the state engineer under this section, is conclusive, till superseded in a proper proceeding, on distributing officers, as to quantity of water to which an appropriator for irrigation is entitled, as well as to priorities. Parshall v. Cowper, 22 Wyo. 385, 143 P. 302,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1914).

Adjudicated water rights of long standing are not readily to set aside

and will not be set aside unless the proof of just cause is clear, cogent and convincing. White v. Wheatland Irrigation Dist., 413 P.2d 252,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1966).

Record of examination. —

The record of examination and measurements by state engineer under this section does not affect the question as to the times when uncultivated land may have been irrigated and the extent of an appropriation therefor as to the period of use. Nichols v. Hufford, 21 Wyo. 477, 133 P. 1084,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1913).

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).